District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.19

Continuation of the Board of Education.

The term of any member elected to the District of Columbia Board of Education, and the powers and duties of the Board of Education shall not be affected by the provisions of § 1-204.95 [repealed]. No provision of such section shall be construed to extend the term of any such member or to terminate the term of any such member.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 719

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-207.71.